District of Columbia statutes.
38-2951

Financial Management Reform Plan.

(a)

The Superintendent of the public schools shall develop a Financial Management Reform Plan (“Reform Plan”) which shall include the following:

(1)

Measurable goals;

(2)

Timeline for deliverables;

(3)

Roles and responsibilities of all District agencies that provide financial management related services;

(4)

Proposed statutory and regulatory amendments to approve the budget process;

(5)

Targeted savings activities, and reallocations within the DCPS budget, for the next 2 fiscal years; and

(6)

Review and input from members of the Financial Management Task Force.

(b)

The Superintendent shall submit the Reform Plan to the Board of Education for its approval.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-211, § 4, 51 DCR 8805
Former § 38-2951 has been recodified as § 38-2931.
This section is referenced in § 38-2952.